Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.704

Funds for assistance of student participants in intercollegiate activities or activities relating to performing arts.

Funds used for purposes of providing scholarships or other forms of financial assistance to students in return for participation in intercollegiate athletics in accordance with RCW 28B.10.703 shall include but not be limited to moneys received as contributed or donated funds, or revenues derived from athletic events, including gate receipts and revenues obtained from the licensing of radio and television broadcasts.

Funds used for purposes of providing scholarships or other forms of financial assistance to students in return for participation in curriculum-related activities relating to performing arts shall include but not be limited to moneys received as contributed or donated funds, or revenues derived from performing arts events, including admission receipts and revenues obtained from the licensing of radio and television broadcasts.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 1 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 46 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 28 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 46: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 46 s 11.]